District of Columbia statutes.
42-144

Notarial acts in other jurisdictions of the United States.

(a)

A notarial act shall have the same effect under the law of the District as if the notarial act had been performed by a notarial officer of the District, if the notarial act is performed in another state, commonwealth, territory, district, or possession of the United States by:

(1)

A notary public of the jurisdiction;

(2)

A judge, clerk, or deputy clerk of a court of the jurisdiction; or

(3)

Any other person authorized by the law of the jurisdiction to perform a notarial act.

(b)

A notarial act performed in any other jurisdiction of the United States under federal authority as provided in § 42-145 shall have the same effect as if performed by a notarial officer of the District.

(c)

The signature and title of a person who performs a notarial act in another jurisdiction are prima facie evidence that the signature is genuine and that the person holds the designated title.

(d)

The signature and indicated title of an officer listed in subsection (a)(1) or (2) of this section shall establish conclusively the authority of a holder of that title to perform a notarial act.

Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-205, § 5, 37 DCR 8444
1981 Ed., § 45-624.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Law on Notarial Acts.